apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
<pardef n="/el_meu__det">   
                  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>meu</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
      <e r="RL">
	<p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>meu</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>meus</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
	<p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>meus</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>meva</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>meua</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>meves</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>meues</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>    
  </pardef>

   <pardef n="/el_teu__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>teves</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>teues</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>teva</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>teua</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>teus</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>teus</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>teu</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>teu</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="/el_seu__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>seves</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>seues</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>seva</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>seua</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>seus</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>seus</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>seu</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>seu</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="/el_nostre__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>nostra</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   <pardef n="/el_vostre__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>vostra</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="cert__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="altr/e__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
          
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  <pardef n="/el_mateix__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>mateix</l>
          <r>el<b/>mateix<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>mateixa</l>
          <r>el<b/>mateix<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>mateixos</l>
          <r>el<b/>mateix<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>mateixes</l>
          <r>el<b/>mateix<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="cert"><i>cert</i><par n="cert__det"/></e>
<e lm="el mateix"><i/><par n="/el_mateix__det"/></e>
<e lm="el meu"><par n="/el_meu__det"/></e>
<e lm="el nostre"><par n="/el_nostre__det"/></e>
<e lm="el seu"><par n="/el_seu__det"/></e>
<e lm="el teu"><par n="/el_teu__det"/></e>
<e lm="el vostre"><par n="/el_vostre__det"/></e>
<e lm="altre"><i>altr</i><par n="altr/e__det"/></e>
<e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="cert__det"/></e>
